Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1107.
do enact as follows:AB1107,11Section 1. 101.149 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB1107,2,72101.149 (2) (b) Elementary and secondary schools and child care centers. 3Carbon monoxide detectors shall be provided in public and private elementary and 4secondary schools that are served by a fuel-burning appliance and in child care 5centers licensed under s. 48.65 that are served by a fuel-burning appliance. Carbon 6monoxide detectors shall be installed in each room containing a fuel-burning 7appliance and shall satisfy all of the following:AB1107,2,981. For a building designed before the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB 9inserts date], the carbon monoxide detectors shall satisfy any of the following:AB1107,2,1010a. The carbon monoxide detectors shall be powered by batteries.AB1107,2,1311b. The carbon monoxide detectors shall be permanently powered by the 12building’s electrical system and be monitored by any fire alarm system required for 13the building.AB1107,3,2142. For a building designed on or after the effective date of this subdivision .... 15[LRB inserts date], the carbon monoxide detectors shall be permanently powered by 1the building’s electrical system and be monitored by any fire alarm system required 2for the building.AB1107,3,533. The carbon monoxide detectors shall bear an Underwriters Laboratories, 4Inc., listing mark or similar mark from an independent product safety certification 5organization.AB1107,26Section 2. 101.149 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1107,3,107101.149 (3) (a) The owner of a residential building or a building described in 8sub. (2) (b) shall reasonably maintain every carbon monoxide detector in the 9residential building in the manner specified in the instructions for the carbon 10monoxide detector.AB1107,311Section 3. 101.149 (3) (am) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1107,3,1612101.149 (3) (am) If any person certified under s. 101.12 (4) or 101.14 (4r) gives 13written notice to an owner of a residential building or a building described in sub. 14(2) (b) that a carbon monoxide detector in the residential building is not functional, 15the owner shall provide, within 5 days after receipt of that notice, any maintenance 16necessary to make that carbon monoxide detector functional.AB1107,417Section 4. 101.149 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1107,3,2218101.149 (7) Inspection. To ensure compliance with subs. (2) and (3), the 19department or a person certified under s. 101.12 (4) or 101.14 (4r) may inspect a 20building described in sub. (2) (b), may inspect the common area of residential 21buildings, and may inspect a unit within such buildings a residential building at 22the request of the owner or occupant of the unit to be inspected.AB1107,523Section 5. 165.88 (3m) (d) of the statutes is repealed.AB1107,624Section 6. 165.88 (3r) of the statutes is created to read:AB1107,4,41165.88 (3r) Grants to schools for carbon monoxide detectors. (a) 2From the appropriation under s. 20.455 (2) (f), the department of justice shall 3award grants of up to $3,000 to schools to assist them in complying with s. 101.149 4(2) (b).AB1107,4,75(b) The department shall accept applications for the grants under this 6subsection from school boards, operators of independent charter schools, governing 7bodies of private schools, and tribal schools.AB1107,4,98(c) Grant moneys awarded under this subsection shall be used to acquire or 9install carbon monoxide detectors to comply with s. 101.149 (2) (b).AB1107,710Section 7. 165.88 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1107,4,1411165.88 (4) Report. The department of justice shall submit an annual report 12to the cochairpersons of the joint committee on finance providing an account of the 13grants awarded under sub. (2) this section and the expenditures made with the 14grant moneys.AB1107,815Section 8. Fiscal changes.AB1107,4,1916(1) Grants for carbon monoxide detectors in schools. In the schedule 17under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of justice under s. 1820.455 (2) (f), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $75,000 to 19award grants under s. 165.88 (3r).AB1107,920Section 9. Effective date.AB1107,4,2221(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 22publication.AB1107,4,2323